Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1273.01
Rules of procedure.

The Supreme Court shall promulgate rules of procedure for discovery in civil cases, which rules shall not be in conflict with laws governing such matters. Rules which provide for the admissibility of depositions shall not be considered as conflicting with the Nebraska Evidence Rules.

Laws 1982, LB 716, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 921, § 8.

Nebraska Evidence Rules, see section 27-1103.

The language of this section, in combination with section 27-802, indicates a clear intention by the Legislature to create an independent avenue to admit deposition testimony. Walton v. Patil, 279 Neb. 974, 783 N.W.2d 438 (2010).